test/src/morphology/V-tjerrut_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - tjerrut: # Verb 'to bring' - ei tsekattu
     tjerrut+V+Inf: tjerrut
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tjerruv
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tjerru
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tjerru
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tjerrujin
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: tjerrubehtin
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: tjerrubähtten
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: tjerruba
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tjerrup
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tjerrubihtit
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tjerrubehtit
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tjerruji

     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tjerrujiv
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tjerruji
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tjerruj
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: tjerrujmen
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: tjerrujden
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: tjerrujga
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tjerrujme
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tjerrujde
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tjerrujin

     tjerrut+V+Pot+Sg1: tjerrutjav
     tjerrut+V+Pot+Sg2: tjerrutja
     tjerrut+V+Pot+Sg3: tjerrutj
     tjerrut+V+Pot+Du1: tjerrutjin
     tjerrut+V+Pot+Du2: [tjerrutjiehpen, tjerrutjähppen] 
     tjerrut+V+Pot+Du3: tjerrutjiebá
     tjerrut+V+Pot+Pl1: tjerrutjip
     tjerrut+V+Pot+Pl2: tjerrutjihpit
     tjerrut+V+Pot+Pl3: tjerrutji
